California statutes. Insurance Code
(a) The fee for filing an application for a nonresident license described in Section 1639, and renewal thereof or changes in outstanding licenses, shall be the same amount that is established in this code for a resident license of the same type. If the applicant’s state, territory of the United States, commonwealth, or Canadian province of residence has fees for any nonresident insurance license greater than for a like resident license, the commissioner may charge a fee equal to the amount a California resident would be required to pay to obtain a like license for a like term in the applicant’s state, territory of the United States, commonwealth, or Canadian province of residence.

(b) The fee for filing an application for a nonresident limited lines license described in Section 1639, and renewal thereof or changes in outstanding licenses, shall be the same amount that is established in this code for a resident property broker-agent license or a resident casualty broker-agent license. This section shall not be construed to require a countersignature on a policy or contract, or the payment of a countersignature fee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 411, Sec. 43.   (AB 1416)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1751.

The commissioner shall require, in advance, a fee for filing the following documents:

(a) Application for registration of change in membership of a copartnership licensed as any of the following:

(1) Casualty broker-agent, eighty-five dollars ($85).

(2) Property broker-agent, eighty-five dollars ($85).

(3) Property and casualty broker-agent, when applied for on a single application, eighty-five dollars ($85).

(4) Life agent, resident, eighty-five dollars ($85).

(5) Life
 agent, nonresident, eighty-five dollars ($85).

(6) Personal lines broker-agent, eighty-five dollars ($85).

(b) Notice for adding or removing from any life agent’s, property broker-agent’s, casualty broker-agent’s, or personal lines broker-agent’s license issued to an organization the name of any natural person named thereon, twenty-nine dollars ($29).

(c) First amendment to an application, fourteen dollars ($14); a second and each subsequent amendment to an application, twenty-nine dollars ($29).

(d) Original application to be given the qualifying examination for a license of a property, casualty, or personal lines licensee, fifty dollars ($50) for each person to be examined.

(e) Original
 application to be given the qualifying examination for a license of a life licensee, fifty dollars ($50) for each person to be examined.

(f) Application for reexamination for any of the licenses mentioned in this section, fifty dollars ($50) for each person to be reexamined.

(g) Application that includes a request for a certificate of convenience pursuant to Article 8 (commencing with Section 1685), thirty-five dollars ($35) in addition to, and not in lieu of, fees otherwise required.

(h) Application or request for approval of a true or fictitious name pursuant to Section 1724.5, fifty-three dollars ($53), except that there shall be no fee when the name is contained in an original application.

(i) “A ratification of appointments of agents” whereby the
 surviving insurer in a merger or consolidation assumes responsibility for all agents then lawfully appointed for one of the constituent insurers and makes each its agent, one hundred eighty-five dollars ($185).

(j) A bond, pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 1662) or Section 1760.5 or 1765, except when the bond constitutes part of an original application filing, twenty-nine dollars ($29).

(k) An application or request for clearance and cancellation notice of a current licensee of record, twenty-nine dollars ($29).

(l) An amended action notice pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 1704, eleven dollars ($11).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 534, Sec. 36.   (AB 1699)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

1751.1.

(a) The commissioner shall require seventy-five dollars ($75), in advance, as a fee for filing an application for certification as a 12-hour ethics course or continuing education provider pursuant to Section 1749.1. That certification shall be effective for a period of 24 months.

(b) The commissioner shall require seventy-five dollars ($75), in advance, as a fee for filing an application to renew certification as a 12-hour ethics course or continuing education provider pursuant to Section 1749.1. That certification shall be effective for a period of 24 months.

(c) The commissioner shall require seventy-five dollars ($75), in
 advance, as a fee for filing an application for certification of a 12-hour ethics course pursuant to Section 1749. That certification shall be effective for a period of 24 months.

(d) The commissioner shall require thirty-seven dollars ($37), in advance, as a fee for filing an application to renew certification of a 12-hour ethics course pursuant to Section 1749. That certification shall be effective for a period of 24 months.

(e) The commissioner shall require thirty-seven dollars ($37), in advance, as a fee for filing an application for certification of a continuing education course, program, or seminar pursuant to Section 1749.3 and Section 1749.32. That certification shall be effective for a period of 24 months.

(f) The commissioner shall require fourteen dollars ($14), in advance, as a fee for filing an application to renew certification of a continuing education course, program, or seminar pursuant to Section 1749.3 and Section 1749.32. That certification shall be effective for a period of 24 months.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 566, Sec. 8.   (AB 943)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

1751.3.

The commissioner shall require twenty-nine dollars ($29), in advance, as a fee for filing each notice of appointment or each notice of termination pursuant to Section 1707 of any of the following:

(a) A casualty broker-agent to act as an insurance agent.

(b) A property broker-agent to act as an insurance agent.

(c) A life agent.

(d) A travel insurance agent.

(e) A casualty broker-agent to act as an insurance solicitor.

(f) A property broker-agent to act as an
 insurance solicitor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 534, Sec. 38.   (AB 1699)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

1751.5.

The fees required by this chapter and by Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 1760), Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 1800), and Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 1831) of this part, and by Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 15000) of Division 5 are filing fees, no portion of which shall be refunded whether or not the application is acted upon or the examination is taken.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 833, Sec. 3.   (SB 488)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

1751.6.

(a) The commissioner may prepare a list of all currently licensed producers. All those lists shall be at the expense of the insurer, organization, or person requesting this service, except that special lists that are a part of the regulatory responsibility of the department may be at the expense of the state in the discretion of the commissioner. The costs and expenses of all those lists shall be paid from the support appropriation for the department current at the time of the preparation of the list but shall be charged to, and collected from, the insurer, organization, or person requesting the list. All list preparation expense moneys collected by the department under this section are hereby appropriated to the department and shall be deposited in the Insurance Fund to the credit of the
 support appropriation for the department current at the time of the deposit. If any insurer, organization, or person refuses to pay those costs and expenses promptly when due, the commissioner may refuse to issue its certificate of authority, certificate of exemption, or license, as the case may be, and may revoke any existing certificate of authority, certificate of exemption, or license.

(b) The fees for producers licensed in this state are as follows:

(1) Resident insurance producer (individual), three thousand sixty dollars ($3,060).

(2) Resident property and casualty broker-agent (individual), eight hundred thirty-three dollars ($833).

(3) Resident life agent (individual), one thousand five hundred twenty-six dollars ($1,526).

(4) Resident insurance producer (agency), one hundred forty-seven dollars ($147).

(5) Nonresident insurance producer (individual), eight hundred ninety-five dollars ($895).

(6) Nonresident property and casualty broker-agent (individual), two hundred twelve dollars ($212).

(7) Nonresident life agent (individual), four hundred twenty-four dollars ($424).

(8) Nonresident insurance producer (agency), eighty-eight dollars ($88).

(9) Bail (individual), eighty-eight dollars ($88).

(10) Bail (agency), eighty-eight dollars ($88).

(11) Resident estate certificate of convenience, eighty-eight dollars ($88).

(12) Interim public insurance adjuster, eighty-eight dollars ($88).

(13) Resident adjuster (individual), eighty-eight dollars ($88).

(14) Reinsurance intermediary broker, eighty-eight dollars ($88).

(15) Reinsurance intermediary manager, eighty-eight dollars ($88).

(16) Resident adjuster (agency), eighty-eight dollars ($88).

(17) Nonresident adjuster (agency), eighty-eight dollars ($88).

(18) Resident personal lines broker-agent
 (individual), eighty-eight dollars ($88).

(19) Resident personal lines broker-agent (agency), eighty-eight dollars ($88).

(20) Nonresident personal lines broker-agent (individual), eighty-eight dollars ($88).

(21) Nonresident personal lines broker-agent (agency), eighty-eight dollars ($88).

(22) Resident credit insurance agent (individual), eighty-eight dollars ($88).

(23) Resident credit insurance agent (agency), eighty-eight dollars ($88).

(24) Nonresident credit insurance agent (individual), eighty-eight dollars ($88).

(25) Nonresident credit insurance agent
 (agency), eighty-eight dollars ($88).

(26) All (no restrictions on license type), four thousand fifteen dollars ($4,015).

(27) Partial listing, eight hundred thirty-nine dollars ($839), plus one cent ($0.01) per name.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 534, Sec. 39.   (AB 1699)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

1751.7.

The commissioner may periodically publish a newsletter containing summaries of rules, regulations, interpretative opinions, and other information as the commissioner deems important to the proper conduct of the insurance business in this state by persons and organizations licensed under this chapter. All costs of the publication shall be covered by and included in license fees paid by persons licensed under this chapter. The fees shall be reviewed annually for sufficiency for this purpose, and shall be increased or decreased as necessary. The amount of the fees to be utilized for this purpose shall be set forth as a separate line item in the department’s annual budget.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 133, Sec. 31.   (SB 272)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 15. Travel Insurance Agents [1752. - 1757.]

1752.

The commissioner may issue a limited lines travel insurance agent license to any organization engaged in transacting travel insurance through travel retailers not otherwise meeting the conditions set forth in Section 1754.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 257, Sec. 1.   (AB 2354)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

1753.

As used in this article, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Limited lines travel insurance agent” means an insurer designee that is licensed to transact travel insurance, as defined in subdivision (b).

(b) “Transact” means, for the purposes of this article, the following activities when engaged in by a travel retailer:

(1) Offering and disseminating information to a prospective or current policyholder on behalf of a limited lines travel insurance agent, including brochures, buyer guides, descriptions of coverage, and price.

(2) Referring specific questions regarding coverage features and benefits from a prospective or current policyholder to a limited lines travel insurance agent.

(3) Disseminating and processing applications for coverage, coverage selection forms, or other similar forms in response to a request from a prospective or current policyholder.

(4) Collecting premiums from a prospective or current policyholder on behalf of a limited lines travel insurance agent.

(5) Receiving and recording information from a policyholder to share with a limited lines travel insurance agent.

(c) (1) “Travel insurance” means insurance coverage for personal
 risks incidental to planned travel, including one or more of the following:

(A) Interruption or cancellation of a trip or event.

(B) Loss of baggage or personal effects.

(C) Damages to accommodations or rental vehicles.

(D) Sickness, accident, disability, or death occurring during travel.

(2) Travel insurance does not include major medical plans, which provide comprehensive medical protection for travelers with trips lasting six months or longer, including, for example, those working overseas as an expatriate or military personnel being deployed.

(3) Travel insurance does not include damage waiver contracts, as defined in subdivision (g) of Section 1939.01 of the Civil Code. The phrase “damage waiver” or “collision damage waiver” cannot be used to describe travel insurance coverage, but the insurance contract may otherwise refer to “damage waiver” or “collision damage waiver” provided by a rental company, as defined in
 subdivision (a) of Section 1939.01 of the Civil Code.

(d) “Travel retailer” means a business organization that makes, arranges, or offers travel services and may offer and disseminate travel insurance as a service to its customers on behalf of and under the direction of a limited lines travel insurance agent.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 231, Sec. 12.   (AB 2045)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

1754.

Transaction of travel insurance under the license of an organization holding a limited lines travel insurance agent license shall be subject to the following conditions:

(a) A limited lines travel insurance agent may authorize a travel retailer to transact travel insurance on behalf of and under its authority under the following conditions:

(1) The limited lines travel insurance agent is clearly identified on marketing materials and fulfillment packages distributed by the travel retailers to customers. The marketing materials and fulfillment packages shall include the agent’s name, business address, email address, telephone number, license number, and the availability of the department’s toll-free consumer hotline.

(2) The limited lines travel insurance agent, at the time of licensure and thereafter, maintains a register noting each travel retailer that transacts travel insurance on the licensee’s behalf. The register shall be maintained and updated annually by the licensee in a form prescribed by, or format acceptable to, the commissioner and shall include the name and contact information of the travel retailer and an officer or person who directs or controls the travel retailer’s operations, and the travel retailer’s federal employer identification number (FEIN). The licensee shall also certify that the registered travel retailer complies with Section 1033 of Title 18 of the United States Code. The licensee shall submit the register for review and inspection upon request by the department.

(3) The limited lines travel insurance agent has designated one of its employees to be responsible for
 its compliance with the insurance laws, rules, and regulations of the state. The limited lines travel insurance agent and its designated responsible employees shall hold property, casualty, life, and accident and health or sickness agent licenses, to the extent required by this chapter, based upon the types of insurance transacted by the licensee.

(4) The employee designated by the limited lines travel insurance agent, pursuant to paragraph (3), and any of the organization’s partners, members, controlling persons, officers, directors, and managers comply with the background check requirements as required by the commissioner.

(5) The limited lines travel insurance agent has paid all applicable licensing fees required under California law.

(6) The limited lines travel insurance agent uses all reasonable means at its
 disposal to ensure compliance by the travel retailer and the travel retailer’s employees with their obligations under this article. This includes requiring each employee of the travel retailer whose duties include transacting travel insurance to receive training. The training shall be provided whenever there is a material change that requires a modification to the training materials, but in no event less frequently than every three years. Training materials used by or on behalf of the limited lines travel insurance agent to train the employees of a travel retailer shall be submitted to the department at the time the travel insurance agent applies for a license under this article, and whenever modified thereafter. The training materials, at a minimum, should contain instruction on the types of insurance offered, ethical sales practices, and disclosures to prospective insurance customers. Any changes to previously submitted training materials shall be submitted to the department with the changes highlighted 30
 days prior to their use by the limited lines travel insurance agent. Training materials and changes to those materials submitted to the department pursuant to this subdivision shall be deemed approved for use by the limited lines travel insurance agent unless it is notified by the department to the contrary. Failure by a limited lines travel insurance agent to submit training materials or changes for departmental review or use of unapproved or disapproved training materials shall constitute grounds for denial of an application for a license, nonrenewal of a license, or suspension of a license, or other action as deemed appropriate by the commissioner.

(7) The limited lines travel insurance agent or the travel retailer provides disclosure to the consumer, in either the marketing materials or fulfillment packages, that is substantively similar to the following:

This plan provides insurance coverage that
 only applies during the covered trip. You may have coverage from other sources that provides you with similar benefits but may be subject to different restrictions depending upon your other coverages. You may wish to compare the terms of this policy with your existing life, health, home, and automobile insurance policies. If you have any questions about your current coverage, call your insurer or insurance agent or broker.

(8) The limited lines travel insurance agent or the travel retailer makes all of the following disclosures to the prospective insured, which shall be acknowledged in writing by the purchaser or displayed by clear and conspicuous signs that are posted at every location where contracts are executed, including, but not limited to, the counter where the purchaser signs the service agreement, or provided in writing to the purchaser:

(A) That purchasing travel
 insurance is not required in order to purchase any other product or service offered by the travel retailer.

(B) If not individually licensed, that the travel retailer’s employee is not qualified or authorized to:

(i) Answer technical questions about the benefits, exclusions, and conditions of any of the insurance offered by the travel retailer.

(ii) Evaluate the adequacy of the prospective insured’s existing insurance coverage.

(b) A travel retailer that meets the requirements set forth in this section and whose activities are limited to offering and selling travel insurance on behalf of a licensed limited lines travel insurance agent is authorized to receive compensation.

(c) (1) If the commissioner determines that a travel retailer, or a travel retailer’s employee, has violated any provision of this article or any other provision of this code, the commissioner may:

(A) Direct the limited lines travel insurance agent to implement a corrective action plan with the travel retailer.

(B) Direct the limited lines travel insurance agent to revoke the authorization of the travel retailer to transact travel insurance on its behalf and under its license and to remove the travel retailer’s name from its register.

(2) If the commissioner determines that a travel retailer, or a travel retailer’s employee, has violated any provision in this article or any other provision of this code, the commissioner, after notice and hearing, may:

(A) Suspend or revoke the license of the limited lines travel insurance agent as authorized under this code.

(B) Impose a monetary fine on the limited lines travel insurance agent.

(3) A limited lines travel insurance agent who aids and abets a travel retailer in the transaction of travel insurance, as defined in this code, or aids and abets a travel retailer in any activity concerning travel insurance after being directed to revoke the travel retailer’s authorization, in addition to any other action authorized under this code, shall be subject to a monetary penalty pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 12921.8.

(d) The conduct of employees of the travel retailer who have been designated to transact travel insurance on behalf of the licensed limited lines travel insurance agent shall be
 deemed the conduct of the licensed limited lines travel insurance agent for purposes of this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 184, Sec. 27.   (SB 1255)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

1755.

(a) An applicant for a limited lines travel insurance agent license under this article shall submit the following documents to the commissioner:

(1) A written application for licensure, signed by the applicant or an officer of the applicant, in the form prescribed by the commissioner.

(2) A certificate by the insurer that is to be named in the limited lines travel insurance agent license, stating that the insurer has satisfied itself that the named applicant is trustworthy and competent to act as its limited lines travel insurance agent and that the insurer will appoint the applicant to act as its agent if the travel insurance agent license applied for is issued by the commissioner. The certification
 shall be subscribed by an officer or managing agent of the insurer on a form prescribed by the commissioner.

(3) An application fee, and, for each license period thereafter, a renewal fee of two thousand sixty-four dollars ($2,064).

(b) Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the provisions set forth in Sections 1667, 1668, 1668.5, 1669, 1670, 1738, and 1739 apply to any application for or issuance of a license pursuant to this article.

(c) Costs associated with any enforcement action shall be paid for by the person or organization licensed pursuant to this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 534, Sec. 40.   (AB 1699)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

1756.

The provisions of this chapter relating to the appointment and termination of an insurance agent by an insurer or its authorized representative are applicable to licenses issued pursuant to this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

1757.

The commissioner may adopt rules and regulations for the implementation of this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 257, Sec. 7.   (AB 2354)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 15.5. Cargo Shippers’ Agents [1757.1. - 1757.3.]

1757.1.

A limited license may be issued to a natural person or to an organization who or which acts as an agent on behalf of a cargo owner, a cargo shipper, or both. The limited license shall authorize the agent of the cargo owner, cargo shipper, or both to procure cargo insurance only on behalf of a cargo owner or shipper for whom the agent is also arranging for the carriage of goods. The limited license shall authorize the agent acting on behalf of the cargo owner, cargo shipper, or both, only to procure cargo insurance, perform related document preparation, and assist the cargo owners or shippers, or both, with the filing of claims or preparation of proofs of loss in connection with filing claims and performing similar claims activities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 558, Sec. 13.   (AB 487)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

1757.2.

A limited cargo shipper’s license shall be applied for and renewed in the same manner as is provided in this chapter for a licensee to act as a property broker-agent or a casualty broker-agent, except that an applicant for a limited license as a cargo shipper’s agent need not pass a qualifying examination and is exempt from the continuing education requirements. The fee for filing an application shall be twenty-nine dollars ($29) for each year or fraction thereof of the term of the license applied for.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 566, Sec. 9.5.   (AB 943)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

1757.3.

The commissioner may make reasonable rules and regulations necessary for the convenient administration of the provisions of this article respecting the licensing and renewal of licenses of cargo shippers’ agents.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 515, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 16. Variable Contract Agents [1758.1. - 1758.5.]

1758.1.

(a) For the purpose of making provision for the issuance of policies or contracts authorized by Article 5 (commencing with Section 10506) of Chapter 5 of Part 2 of Division 2, the commissioner may grant authority to transact variable life and variable annuity to a person or a natural person named on a license of an organization licensed as a life agent that is appointed by an admitted insurer that is required to register itself or to register a separate account or fund with the United States Securities and Exchange Commission under the Federal Investment Company Act of 1940, or to register its variable policies or contracts with the Securities and Exchange Commission under the Federal Securities Act of 1933, and has complied with that requirement. The commissioner may grant variable life and variable annuity authority to a
 person who is not a resident of California and is not a licensed life agent in California provided that the person is licensed for both life and variable annuity authority in the resident state.

(b) A person shall not act as an agent of the insurer in the transaction of the policies or contracts unless the person holds a valid authority under this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 184, Sec. 28.   (SB 1255)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

1758.2.

Any authority granted pursuant to the provisions of this article shall be effective only while a permanent underlying life agent’s license and registration in accordance with the rules of the United States Securities and Exchange Commission or the Financial Industry Regulatory Authority remains in full force and effect. The provisions of subdivision (b) of Section 1704 relating to the inactivation and reactivation of the underlying life agent’s license, and the renewal thereof, shall apply to any authority issued pursuant to this article, except that references to agency appointments and terminations shall relate only to the underlying life agent’s license. The authority may be revoked, suspended, or otherwise affected for the same reasons and by the same procedures
 as a life agent’s license.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 411, Sec. 48.   (AB 1416)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1758.3.

The commissioner shall not grant authority to transact variable life and variable annuity unless the life agent or applicant furnishes proof that the person is registered to sell securities in California in accordance with the rules of the United States Securities and Exchange Commission or the Financial Industry Regulatory Authority. Any authority granted to a life agent to transact variable life and variable annuity shall immediately terminate upon the life agent no longer being registered to sell securities in accordance with the rules of the United States Securities and Exchange Commission or the Financial Industry Regulatory Authority.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 184, Sec. 29.   (SB 1255)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

1758.5.

The commissioner may, pursuant to Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 11371), Part 1, Division 3, Title 2 of the Government Code, adopt reasonable rules and regulations necessary for the convenient administration of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1707.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 16.1. Portable Electronics Insurance  [1758.6. - 1758.693.]

1758.6.

No portable electronics vendor shall offer or sell any form of portable electronics insurance in this state unless that person is licensed as an insurance agent or broker pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 1631) or has complied with the requirements of this article and has been issued a license by the commissioner as provided in this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 165, Sec. 1.   (AB 690)   Effective January 1, 2012.   Note: See conditions in Section 1758.693 regarding the initial operative date of Article 16.1, commencing with Section 1758.6.)
-------------------------------------------

1758.61.

The commissioner may issue to an applicant that has complied with the requirements of this article a portable electronics insurance agent license that authorizes the licensee and its endorsees to offer or sell insurance in connection with, and incidental to, the sale of portable electronics or the sale or provision of accessories or services related to the use of portable electronics.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 165, Sec. 2.   (AB 690)   Effective January 1, 2012.   Note: See conditions in Section 1758.693 regarding the initial operative date of Article 16.1, commencing with Section 1758.6.)
-------------------------------------------

1758.62.

(a) An applicant for a portable electronics insurance agent license under this article shall submit all of the following to the commissioner:

(1) A written application for licensure, signed by the applicant or an officer of the applicant, in the form prescribed by the commissioner.

(2) A certificate by the insurer that is to be named in the portable electronics insurance agent license, stating that the insurer has satisfied itself that the named applicant is trustworthy and competent to act as its insurance agent limited to this purpose and that the insurer will appoint the applicant to act as its agent to transact the kind or kinds of insurance that are permitted by this article, if the portable
 electronics insurance agent license applied for is issued by the commissioner. The certification shall be subscribed by an officer or managing agent of the insurer on a form prescribed by the commissioner.

(3) An application fee, and, for each license period thereafter, a renewal fee, of two hundred ninety-two dollars ($292).

(b) Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the provisions set forth in Sections 1667, 1668, 1668.5, 1669, 1670, 1738, and 1739 apply to any application for or issuance of a license pursuant to this article.

(c) Costs associated with any enforcement action or investigation shall be paid for by the person or organization licensed pursuant to this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 534, Sec. 42.   (AB 1699)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

1758.63.

An endorsee of a portable electronics vendor that has been issued a portable electronics insurance agent license pursuant to this article may sell or offer insurance products under the authority of the vendor’s portable electronics insurance agent license if all of the following conditions have been met:

(a) The endorsee is 18 years of age or older.

(b) The portable electronics vendor, at the time it submits its portable electronics insurance agent’s license application pursuant to Section 1758.62, also establishes a list of all locations in this state at which it offers coverage under a policy of portable electronics insurance. The list
 shall be maintained by the portable electronics vendor in a form prescribed by, or format acceptable to, the commissioner and shall be updated annually. The list shall be maintained by the portable electronics vendor and made available to the commissioner for review and inspection upon request.

(c) Each portable electronics vendor licensed pursuant to this article shall provide for the training of its endorsees under a program developed by a licensed property and casualty broker or agent prior to allowing its endorsees to offer or sell insurance products. The training shall meet the following minimum standards:

(1) Each endorsee shall receive instruction about the types of insurance specified in subdivision (e) of Section 1758.69 that are offered for sale to prospective customers.

(2) Each endorsee shall receive
 training about ethical sales practices.

(3) Each endorsee shall receive training about the disclosures to be given to prospective customers pursuant to Section 1758.66.

(4) The retraining of endorsees shall be conducted whenever there is a material change in the insurance products sold that requires modification of the training materials, but in no event less frequently than every three years for each endorsee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 165, Sec. 4.   (AB 690)   Effective January 1, 2012.   Note: See conditions in Section 1758.693 regarding the initial operative date of Article 16.1, commencing with Section 1758.6.)
-------------------------------------------

1758.64.

An endorsee may act on behalf of and under the supervision of the portable electronics insurance agent in matters relating to transacting insurance under that agent’s license. The conduct of an endorsee of a portable electronics insurance agent acting within the scope of employment or agency shall be deemed the conduct of the portable electronics insurance agent for purposes of this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 165, Sec. 5.   (AB 690)   Effective January 1, 2012.   Note: See conditions in Section 1758.693 regarding the initial operative date of Article 16.1, commencing with Section 1758.6.)
-------------------------------------------

1758.65.

(a) If a licensee or endorsee violates any provision of this article or any other provision of this code, the commissioner may do any of the following:

(1) After notice and hearing, suspend or revoke the license of the portable electronics insurance agent.

(2) After notice and hearing, impose fines on the portable electronics insurance agent for its conduct or that of its endorsees.

(3) After notice and hearing, impose other penalties that the commissioner deems necessary and convenient to carry out the purpose of this code, including suspending the privilege of transacting
 portable electronics insurance pursuant to this article at specific business locations where violations have occurred, imposing fines on the portable electronics insurance agent, and suspending or revoking the ability of individual endorsees to act under the vendor’s license.

(b) If any person or persons sell insurance in connection with, or incidental to, the sale of portable electronics or the sale or provision of accessories or services related thereto, or hold themselves or an organization out as a portable electronics insurance agent without obtaining the license required by this article, or as being licensed pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 1621) without obtaining that license, the commissioner may issue a cease and desist order pursuant to Section 12921.8.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the provisions of Section 1748.5 are applicable to both the organization issued a license pursuant to this article and any endorsee to that license.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 133, Sec. 32.   (SB 272)   Effective July 23, 2021.   Note: See conditions in Section 1758.693 regarding the initial operative date of Article 16.1, commencing with Section 1758.6.)
-------------------------------------------

1758.66.

A portable electronics insurance agent shall not sell insurance pursuant to this article by unsolicited telephone calls or otherwise unless, at the time of sale, or reasonably thereafter with respect to a sale or enrollment occurring by telephone, all of the following conditions are satisfied:

(a) The portable electronics insurance agent provides brochures or other written materials to the prospective purchaser that do all of the following:

(1) Summarize the material terms and conditions of coverage offered, including the identity of the insurer.

(2) Describe the process for
 filing a claim, including a toll-free telephone number to report a claim.

(3) Disclose any additional information on the price, benefits, exclusions, conditions, or other limitations of those policies that the commissioner may, by rule, prescribe.

(4) Provide the name, address, telephone number, and license number of the licensee or the property and casualty broker-agent appointed by the insurer issuing portable electronics insurance coverage to the licensee, as well as the department’s toll-free consumer hotline.

(b) The portable electronics insurance agent or its endorsees make all of the following disclosures, which shall be acknowledged in writing by the purchaser, or displayed by clear and conspicuous signs that are posted at every location where contracts are executed, such as the counter where the purchaser
 signs the service agreement, or provided in writing to the purchaser:

(1) That the purchase by the customer of the kinds of insurance prescribed in this article is not required in order to purchase portable electronics, accessories, or related services.

(2) That the insurance policies offered by the portable electronics insurance agent may provide a duplication of coverage already provided by other insurance policies covering the purchaser.

(3) That the endorsee of the portable electronics insurance agent is not qualified or authorized to evaluate the adequacy of the purchaser’s existing insurance coverages, unless that person is licensed pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 1631).

(4) That the customer may cancel the insurance at any time. If
 the customer cancels any unearned premium will be refunded in accordance with applicable law.

(c) The material terms and conditions of coverage are provided to every person who elects to purchase that coverage.
